src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-83vwtma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `võtma: # Verb (83) `võtma 'eng take/est /fin: ottaa' - full paradigm
     võtma+V+Inf/mA: võtma
     võtma+V+Inf: võttaq
     võtma+V+Ger+Ine: võttõn
     võtma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: võtnuq
     võtma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: võet

     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: võta
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: võtat
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: võtt
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: võtamiq
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: võtatiq
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: võtvaq
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: võti
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: võtit
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: võtt́
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: võtimiq
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: võtitiq
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: võtiq
     võtma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: võta

     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: võeda
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: võedat
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: võetas
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: võedamiq
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: võedatiq
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: võetasõq

     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: võedi
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: võedit
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: võeti
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: võedimiq
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: võeditiq
     võtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: võediq


     võtma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: võtva

     võtma+V+Jus: võtkuq
